pt-PT: Escala das motas com controlo remoto: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; Outra
zh-CN: 遥控摩托车比例: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; 其他
cs: Měřítko motocyklu na dálkové ovládání: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; Jiné
ru: Масштаб радиоуправляемого мотоцикла: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; Другое
da: Skala for RC-motorcykel: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; Andet
hu: Távirányítós motorkerékpár léptéke: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; Egyéb
fr: Balance pour motos télécommandées: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; Autre
en: Remote control motorcycle scale: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; Other
sv: Skala för radiostyrd motorcykel: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; Annat
es: Escala de la motocicleta a control remoto: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; Otro
de: Maßstab des ferngesteuerten Motorrads: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Мащаб на радиоуправляем мотоциклет: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; Други
sl-SI: Lastnosti vajeti: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; Drugo
ko: RC 오토바이 스케일: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; 기타
hr-HR: Mjerilo RC motocikla: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; Ostalo
fi: Kauko-ohjattavan moottoripyörän mittakaava: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; Muu
pl: Skala zdalnie sterowanego motocykla: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; Inne
pt-BR: Motocicleta com controle remoto, escala: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; Outro
ja: リモコンバイクスケール: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; その他
lt-LT: Nuotolinio valdymo motociklų mastelis: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; Kitas
vi: Tỷ lệ của xe máy điều khiển từ xa: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; Khác
nb: Skala for fjernstyrt motorsykkel: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; Annet
sk-SK: Mierka motocykla na diaľkové ovládanie: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; Iné
el: Κλίμακα τηλεκατευθυνόμενης μοτοσικλέτας: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; Άλλο
th: สเกลของรถจักรยานยนต์บังคับวิทยุ: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; อื่นๆ
nl: Schaal radiografisch bestuurbare motorfiets: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; Overig
it: Scala del motociclo telecomandato: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; Altro
ro-RO: Scară a motocicletei cu telecomandă: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; Altele
zh-TW: 遙控機車比例: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; 其他
tr: Uzaktan kumandalı motosiklet ölçeği: 1:10; 1:12; 1:14; 1:16; 1:18; 1:20; 1:24; 1:32; 1:4; 1:5; 1:6; 1:8; 1:9; Diğer